trunk/JLanguageTool/src/resource/is/hunspell/is-IS.aff
FLAG num
#Sagnbeyging 01 vb -aði
SFX 112 N 16
SFX 112   0       r	.
SFX 112   a       um	a
SFX 112   a       ið	a
SFX 112   0       ði	.
SFX 112   0       ðir	.
SFX 112   a       uðum	a
SFX 112   a       uðuð	a
SFX 112	a	uðu	a 
SFX 112   a       i	a
SFX 112	a	ir	a
SFX 112   0       st	.
SFX 112   a       umst	a
SFX 112   a       ist	a
SFX 112   0       ðist	a
SFX 112	a	uðumst	a
SFX 112 	a	uðust	a
