trunk/JLanguageTool/src/resource/is/hunspell/is-IS.dic
athuga/112
bika/112
bora/112
borða/112
elda/112
elska/112
flikka/112
flétta/112
hljóma/112
hósta/112
húfa/112
klifra/112
ropa/112
rugga/112
skipa/112
skrifa/112
sofna/112
síma/112
titra/112
toga/112
vona/112
ætla/112
óska/112
þerra/112
þyrla/112
